California statutes. Civil Code
“You may request records showing the following: (1) that [insert name of debt buyer] has the right to seek collection of the debt; (2) the debt balance, including an explanation of any interest charges and additional fees; (3) the date of default or the date of the last payment; (4) the name of the charge-off creditor and the account number associated with the debt; (5) the name and last known address of the debtor as
 it appeared in the charge-off creditor’s or debt buyer’s records prior to the sale of the debt, as appropriate; and (6) the names of all persons or entities that have purchased the debt. You may also request from us a copy of the contract or other document evidencing your agreement to the debt.

“A request for these records may be addressed to: [insert debt buyer’s active mailing address and email address, if applicable].”
(2) When collecting on a time-barred debt where the debt is not past the date for obsolescence provided for in Section 605(a) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681c):
“The law limits how long you can be sued on a debt. Because of the age of your
 debt, we will not sue you for it. If you do not pay the debt, [insert name of debt buyer] may [continue to] report it to the credit reporting agencies as unpaid for as long as the law permits this reporting.”
(3) When collecting on a time-barred debt where the debt is past the date for obsolescence provided for in Section 605(a) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681c):
“The law limits how long you can be sued on a debt. Because of the age of your debt, we will not sue you for it, and we will not report it to any credit reporting agency.”
(e) If a language other than English is principally used by the debt
 buyer in the initial oral contact with the debtor, the notice required by subdivision (d) shall be provided to the debtor in that language within five working days.

(f) A debt buyer shall not collect, or make any attempt to collect consumer debt that originated with a hospital licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code without including in the first written communication to the debtor a copy of the notice required pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 127425 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) In the event of a conflict between the requirements of subdivision (d) and federal law, so that it is impracticable to comply with both, the requirements of federal law shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 473, Sec. 3.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.54.

(a) All settlement agreements between a debt buyer and a debtor shall be documented in open court or otherwise reduced to writing. The debt buyer shall ensure that a copy of the written agreement is provided to the debtor.

(b) A debt buyer that receives payment on a debt shall provide, within 30 calendar days, a receipt or monthly statement, to the debtor. The receipt or statement shall clearly and
 conspicuously show the amount and date paid, the name of the entity paid, the current account number, the name of the charge-off creditor, the account number issued by the charge-off creditor, and the remaining balance owing, if any. The receipt or statement may be provided electronically if the parties agree.

(c) A debt buyer that accepts a payment as payment in full, or as a full and final compromise of the debt, shall provide, within 30 calendar days, a final statement that complies with subdivision (b). A debt buyer shall not sell an interest in a resolved debt, or any personal or financial information related to the resolved debt.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 64, Sec. 2.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.56.

A debt buyer shall not bring suit or initiate an arbitration or other legal proceeding to collect a consumer debt if the applicable statute of limitations on the debt buyer’s claim has expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 64, Sec. 2.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.58.

In an action brought by a debt buyer on a consumer debt:

(a) The complaint shall allege all of the following:

(1) That the plaintiff is a debt buyer.

(2) The nature of the underlying debt and the consumer transaction or transactions from which it is derived, in a short and plain statement.

(3) That the debt buyer is the sole owner of the debt at issue, or has authority to assert the rights of all owners of the debt.

(4) The debt balance at charge off and an
 explanation of the amount, nature, and reason for all post-charge-off interest and fees, if any, imposed by the charge-off creditor or any subsequent purchasers of the debt. This paragraph shall not be deemed to require a specific itemization, but the explanation shall identify separately the charge-off balance, the total of any post-charge-off interest, and the total of any post-charge-off fees.

(5) The date of default or the date of the last payment.

(6) The name and an address of the charge-off creditor at the time of charge off and the charge-off creditor’s account number associated with the debt. The charge-off creditor’s name and address shall be in sufficient form so as to reasonably identify the charge-off creditor.

(7) The name and last known address of the debtor as they appeared in the charge-off creditor’s records prior to the sale of the debt. If the debt was sold prior to January 1, 2014, the debtor’s name and last known address as they appeared in the debt owner’s records on December 31, 2013, shall be sufficient.

(8) The names and addresses of all persons or entities that purchased the debt after charge off, including the plaintiff debt buyer. The names and addresses shall be in sufficient form so as to reasonably identify each such purchaser.

(9) That the debt buyer has complied with Section 1788.52.

(b) A copy of the contract or other document described in subdivision (b) of Section 1788.52 shall be attached to the complaint.

(c) The complaint in an action brought by a debt buyer for debt that originated with a general acute care hospital licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code shall also contain both of the following:

(1) The information contained in paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 127425 of the Health and Safety Code and a statement identifying the language in which that information was sent to the debtor.

(2) Copies of the application for financial assistance that was provided to the debtor by the hospital and the notice that was provided to the debtor by the hospital about applying for financial assistance, attached to the complaint. If the notice was provided as part of the
 hospital bill that cannot be separated, the bill shall be redacted to remove confidential information, or a sample hospital bill with the substance of the notice regarding financial assistance in the format in use at the time the patient was billed may be provided.

(d) The requirements of this title shall not be deemed to require the disclosure in public records of personal, financial, or medical information, the confidentiality of which is protected by any state or federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 473, Sec. 4.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.60.

(a) In an action initiated by a debt buyer, no default or other judgment may be entered against a debtor unless business records, authenticated through a sworn declaration, are submitted by the debt buyer to the court to establish the facts required to be alleged by paragraphs (3) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1788.58.

(b) No default or other judgment may be entered against a
 debtor unless a copy of the contract or other document described in subdivision (b) of Section 1788.52, authenticated through a sworn declaration, has been submitted by the debt buyer to the court.

(c) In any action on a consumer debt, if a debt buyer plaintiff seeks a default judgment and has not complied with the requirements of this title, the court shall not enter a default judgment for the plaintiff and may, in its discretion, dismiss the action.

(d) Except as provided in this title, this section is not intended to modify or otherwise amend the procedures established in Section 585 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 64, Sec. 2.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.61.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 473.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if service of a summons has not resulted in actual notice to a person in time to defend an action brought by a debt buyer and a default or default judgment has been entered against the person in the action, the person may serve and file a notice of motion and motion to set aside the default or default judgment and for leave to defend the action.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the notice of motion shall be served and filed within a reasonable time, but in no event exceeding the earlier of:

(A) Six years after entry of the
 default or default judgment against the person.

(B) One hundred eighty days of the first actual notice of the action.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), in the case of identity theft or mistaken identity, the notice of motion shall be served and filed within a reasonable time, but in no event exceeding 180 days of the first actual notice of the action.

(B) (i) In the case of identity theft, the person alleging that they are a victim of identity theft shall provide the court with either a copy of a Federal Trade Commission
 identity theft report or a copy of a police report filed by the person alleging that they are the victim of an identity theft crime, including, but not limited to, a violation of Section 530.5 of the Penal Code, for the specific debt associated with the judgment.

(ii) In the case of mistaken identity, the moving party shall provide relevant information or documentation to support the claim that they are not the party named in the judgment or is not the person who incurred or owes the debt.

(b) A notice of motion to set aside a default or default judgment and for leave to defend the action shall designate as the time for making the motion a date prescribed by Section 1005 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and it shall be accompanied by an affidavit stating under oath
 that the person’s lack of actual notice in time to defend the action was not caused by their avoidance of service or inexcusable neglect. The person shall serve and file with the notice a copy of the answer, motion, or other pleading proposed to be filed in the action. Either party may introduce, and the court may consider, evidence in support of its motion or opposition, including evidence relating to the process server who appears on the proof of service of the summons and complaint.

(c) Upon a finding by the court that the motion was made within the period permitted by subdivision (a) and that the person’s lack of actual notice in time to defend the action was not caused by
 their avoidance of service or inexcusable neglect, the court may set aside the default or default judgment on whatever terms as may be just and allow the party to defend the action. If the validity of the judgment is not challenged, the court may select an appropriate remedy other than setting aside the default or default judgment.

(d) This section shall apply to a default or default judgment entered on or after January 1, 2010, except in the case of identity theft or mistaken identity, in which case this section shall apply regardless of the date of the default or default judgment.

(e) This section shall not limit the equitable authority of the court or other available remedies under law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 265, Sec. 2.   (AB 430)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.62.

(a) In the case of an action brought by an individual or individuals, a debt buyer that violates any provision of this title with respect to any person shall be liable to that person in an amount equal to the sum of the following:

(1) Any actual damages sustained by that person as a result of the violation, including, but not limited to, the amount of any judgment obtained by the debt buyer as a
 result of a time-barred suit to collect a debt from that person.

(2) Statutory damages in an amount as the court may allow, which shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) In the case of a class action, a debt buyer that violates any provision of this title shall be liable for any statutory damages for each named plaintiff as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). If the court finds that the debt buyer engaged in a pattern and practice of violating any provision of this title, the court may award additional damages to the class in an amount not to exceed the lesser of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or 1 percent of the net worth of the debt buyer.

(c) (1) In the case of any successful action to enforce liability under
 this section, the court shall award costs of the action, together with reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

(2) Reasonable attorney’s fees may be awarded to a prevailing debt buyer upon a finding by the court that the plaintiff’s prosecution of the action was not in good faith.

(d) In determining the amount of liability under subdivision (b), the court shall consider, among other relevant factors, the frequency and persistence of noncompliance by the debt buyer, the nature of the noncompliance, the resources of the debt buyer, and the number of persons adversely affected.

(e) A debt buyer shall have no civil liability under this section if the debt buyer shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error, and occurred notwithstanding the
 maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid any error.

(f) An action to enforce any liability created by this title shall be brought within one year from the date of the last violation.

(g) Recovery in an action brought under the Rosenthal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788)) or the federal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692 et seq.) shall preclude recovery for the same acts in an action brought under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 64, Sec. 2.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.64.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 64, Sec. 2.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.66.

Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not sell or assign any unpaid COVID-19 rental debt, as defined in Section 1179.02 of the Code of Civil Procedure, for the time period between March 1, 2020, and September 30, 2021, of any person who would have qualified for rental assistance funding provided by the Secretary of the Treasury pursuant to Section 501 of Subtitle A of Title V of Division N of the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law
 116-260) or Section 3201 of Subtitle B of Title III of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2), if the person’s household income is at or below 80 percent of the area median income for the 2020 or 2021 calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 27, Sec. 3.   (AB 832)   Effective June 28, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6C.7. Educational Debt Collection Practices [1788.90. - 1788.94.]

1788.90.

This title shall be known, and may be cited, as the Educational Debt Collection Practices Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   (AB 1313)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.91.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Schools and colleges have threatened to withhold transcripts from students as a debt collection tactic. The practice can cause severe hardship by preventing students from pursuing educational and career opportunities, and it is therefore unfair and contrary to public policy. Moreover, the practice is counterproductive as it may further delay the payment of the debt by creating obstacles to student employment.

(b) It is the purpose of this title to prohibit schools from interfering with student educational and career opportunity by the withholding of transcripts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   (AB 1313)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.92.

For purposes of this title, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “School” means any public or private postsecondary school, or any public or private entity, responsible for providing transcripts to current or former students of a school.

(b) “Debt” means any money, obligation, claim, or sum, due or owing, or alleged to be due or owing, from a student, but does not include the fee, if any, charged to all students for
 the actual costs of providing the transcripts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   (AB 1313)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.93.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, a school shall not do any of the following:

(a) Refuse to provide a transcript for a current or former student on the grounds that the student owes a debt.

(b) Condition the provision of a transcript on the payment of a debt, other than a fee charged to provide the transcript.

(c) Charge a higher fee for obtaining a transcript, or provide less favorable treatment of a transcript request because a student owes a debt.

(d) Use transcript issuance as a tool for debt
 collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   (AB 1313)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.94.

Any waiver of a provision of this title is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 13.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6C.10. Student Loans: Borrower Rights [1788.100. - 1788.106.]



  CHAPTER 1. Student Borrower Bill Of Rights [1788.100. - 1788.101.]

1788.100.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Borrower” means either of the following:

(1) A person who has received or agreed to pay a student loan.

(2) A person who shares responsibility for repaying a student loan with a person described in paragraph (1).

(b) “Borrower with disabilities” means a borrower who a student loan servicer knows, or reasonably should know, is a person who has a disability, as defined in Section 54.

(c) “Borrower working in public service” means a borrower who a student loan
 servicer knows, or reasonably should know, is employed in a public service job, as defined in the Higher Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087e(m)) and its implementing regulations.

(d) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(f) “Engage in the business” means, without limitation, servicing student loans.

(g) “In this state” means any activity of a person relating to servicing student loans that originates from this state and is directed to persons outside this state, that originates from outside this state and is directed to persons inside this state, or that originates inside this state and is directed to persons inside this state.

(h) “Licensee” means a person licensed pursuant to the Student Loan Servicing Act (Division 12.5 (commencing with Section 28100) of the Financial Code).

(i) “Military borrower” means any of the following:

(1) A borrower who is one of the following:

(A) A servicemember as defined in the Servicemember Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. Sec. 3911).

(B) Self-identifies as a service member when interacting with a student loan servicer.

(C) Is a service member as defined in Section 400 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(2) A borrower who is a veteran of a branch of the Armed
 Forces as defined in Section 101 of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(3) An authorized representative of a borrower described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(j) “Older borrower” means a borrower who a student loan servicer knows, or reasonably should know, is a senior citizen, as defined in Section 51.3.

(k) “Overpayment” means a payment on a student loan account in excess of the monthly amount due from a borrower on a student loan, also commonly referred to as a prepayment.

(l) “Partial payment” means a payment on a student loan account in an amount less than the current amount due from a borrower on the student loan account, also commonly referred to as an underpayment.

(m) “Person” means
 an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, an association, a trust, an unincorporated organization, a government, or a political subdivision of a government, and any other entity.

(n) “Qualified request” means any inbound telephone call, the subject of which cannot be resolved in a single phone call, made by a borrower to a student loan servicer in which either the borrower requests specific information from the student loan servicer or reports what the borrower believes to be an error regarding the borrower’s account.

(o) “Qualified written request” means a written correspondence made by a borrower, other than notice on a payment medium supplied by a student loan servicer, that is transmitted by mail, facsimile, or electronically through an email address or internet website designated by the student loan servicer to receive communications from a
 borrower that does all of the following:

(1) Enables the student loan servicer to identify the name and account of the borrower.

(2) Includes a statement of the reasons for the belief by the borrower, to the extent applicable, that the account is in error or that provides sufficient detail to the servicer regarding information sought by the borrower, such as requesting a complete payment history for the loan or the borrower’s account, a copy of the borrower’s student loan promissory note, or the contact information for the creditor to whom the borrower’s student loan is owed.

(p) “Servicing” means any of the following activities related to a student loan of a borrower:

(1) Performing both of the following:

(A) Receiving any scheduled periodic payments from a borrower or any notification that a borrower made a scheduled periodic payment.

(B) Applying payments to the borrower’s account pursuant to the terms of the student loan or the contract governing the servicing.

(2) During a period when no payment is required on a student loan, performing both of the following:

(A) Maintaining account records for the student loan.

(B) Communicating with the borrower regarding the student loan on behalf of the owner of the student loan promissory note.

(3) Interacting with a borrower related to that borrower’s student loan, with the goal of helping
 the borrower avoid default on their student loan or facilitating the activities described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(q) (1) “Student loan” means any loan made solely for use to finance a postsecondary education and costs of attendance at a postsecondary institution, including, but not limited to, tuition, fees, books and supplies, room and board, transportation, and miscellaneous personal expenses. A “student loan” includes a loan made to refinance a student loan.

(2) (A) A “student loan” shall not include an extension of credit under an open-end consumer credit plan, a reverse mortgage transaction, a residential mortgage transaction, or any other loan that is secured by real property or a dwelling.

(B) A “student loan” shall not include an extension of credit made by a
 postsecondary educational institution to a borrower if one of the following applies:

(i) The term of the extension of credit is no longer than the borrower’s education program.

(ii) The remaining, unpaid principal balance of the extension of credit is less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) at the time of the borrower’s graduation or completion of the program.

(iii) The borrower fails to graduate or successfully complete their education program and has a balance due at the time of their disenrollment from the postsecondary institution.

(r) “Student loan account” means student loans owed by a borrower grouped together for billing purposes by a student loan servicer.

(s) “Student loan servicer” means any person engaged in the business of servicing student loans in this state. A “student loan servicer” does not include any of the following:

(1) A debt collector, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1788.2, whose student loan debt collection business, and business operations, involve collecting, or attempting to collect, on defaulted student loans, that is, federal student loans for which no payment has been received for 270 days or more, or private student loans, in default, according to the terms of the loan documents. Debt collectors who also service nondefaulted student loans as part of their business and business operations are “student loan servicers.”

(2) In connection with its responsibilities as a guaranty agency engaged in default aversion, a state or nonprofit private institution or organization having an agreement
 with the United States Secretary of Education under the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1078(b)).

(3) A federally chartered credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 20.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.101.

(a) (1) A person shall not engage in abusive acts or practices when servicing a student loan in this state.

(2) An act or practice is abusive in connection with the servicing of a student loan, if the act or practice does either of the following:

(A) Materially interferes with the ability of a borrower to understand a term or condition of a student loan.

(B) Takes unreasonable advantage of any of the following:

(i) A lack of
 understanding on the part of a borrower of the material risks, costs, or conditions of the student loan.

(ii) The inability of a borrower to protect the interests of the borrower when selecting or using either of the following:

(I) A student loan.

(II) A feature, term, or condition of a student loan.

(iii) The reasonable reliance by the borrower on a person engaged in servicing a student loan to act in the interests of the borrower.

(3) Abusive acts and practices include, but are not limited to, those described in paragraph (2).

(b) A
 student loan servicer shall not do any of the following:

(1) Directly or indirectly employ a scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or mislead a borrower.

(2) Engage in an unfair or deceptive practice toward a borrower or misrepresent or omit material information in connection with the servicing of a student loan, including, but not limited to, misrepresenting the amount, nature, or terms of a fee or payment due or claimed to be due on a student loan, the terms and conditions of the student loan agreement, or the borrower’s obligations under the student loan.

(3) Misapply payments made by a borrower to the outstanding balance of a student loan.

(4) (A) If the student loan servicer is required to or voluntarily reports to a consumer reporting agency, fail to accurately report each borrower’s payment performance to at least one consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis, upon acceptance as a data furnisher by that consumer reporting agency.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis” has the same meaning as defined in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p)).

(5) Refuse to communicate with an authorized representative of the borrower who provides a written authorization signed by the borrower, provided the student loan servicer may adopt reasonable
 procedures for verifying that the representative is in fact authorized to act on behalf of the borrower and for protecting the borrower from fraud or abusive practices.

(6) Negligently or intentionally make a false statement or knowingly and willfully make an omission of a material fact in connection with information or reports filed with the department or another governmental agency.

(7) Engage in an unfair or deceptive practice toward a military borrower or misrepresent or omit material information in connection with the servicing of a student loan owed by a military borrower. For purposes of this paragraph, “misrepresent or omit material information” includes, but is not limited to:

(A) Misrepresenting or omitting
 the availability of a program or protection specific to military borrowers or applicable to military borrowers.

(B) A misrepresentation or omission in violation of paragraph (2) of this subdivision.

(8) Engage in an unfair or deceptive practice toward any borrower working in public service or misrepresent or omit material information in connection with the servicing of a student loan owed by a borrower working in public service. For purposes of this paragraph, “misrepresent or omit material information” includes, but is not limited to:

(A) Misrepresenting or omitting the availability of a program or protection specific to borrowers working in public service or applicable to those borrowers.

(B) A misrepresentation or omission in violation of paragraph (2).

(9) Engage in an unfair or deceptive practice toward an older borrower or older cosigner or misrepresent or omit material information in connection with the servicing of a student loan owed or cosigned by an older borrower. For purposes of this paragraph, “misrepresent or omit material information” includes, but is not limited to:

(A) Misrepresenting or omitting the availability of a program or protection specific to older borrowers or older cosigners or applicable to those borrowers or cosigners.

(B) Misrepresenting or omitting the older borrower’s or older cosigner’s obligations under
 the student loan.

(C) A misrepresentation or omission in violation of paragraph (2).

(10) Engage in an unfair or deceptive practice toward a borrower with a disability or misrepresent or omit material information in connection with the servicing of a student loan owed by a borrower with a disability. For purposes of this paragraph, “misrepresent or omit material information” includes, but is not limited to:

(A) Misrepresenting or omitting the availability of a program or protection specific to borrowers with disabilities or applicable to those borrowers.

(B) A misrepresentation or omission in violation of paragraph (2) of this
 subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 154, Sec. 2.   (AB 376)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Setting Clear “Rules of the Road” for the Student Loan Industry [1788.102. - 1788.102.]

1788.102.

Except to the extent that this section is inconsistent with any provision of federal law or regulation, and then only to the extent of the inconsistency, a student loan servicer shall do all of the following:

(a) Post and process student loan payments in a timely manner pursuant to the servicer’s established payment processing policies that shall be disclosed to and readily accessible by borrowers and credit student loan payments in a timely manner in accordance with the following:

(1) A payment received on or before 11:59 p.m. on the date on which that payment is due, in the amount, manner, and location indicated by the person engaged in student loan servicing, shall be credited as effective on the date on which the
 payment was received by the person engaged in student loan servicing in this state. A person engaged in student loan servicing in this state shall treat a payment received from the borrower on the borrower’s due date as an “on-time” payment.

(2) If a payment is made by check, credit the payment on the date the check was received by the student loan servicer regardless of the date of processing. A borrower’s online account shall reflect payments made within three business days of the date of payment unless payment is made by check and contains no information identifying to which account or loan the payment should be credited. In the event the student loan servicer receives a paper check with no information identifying to which account or loan the payment should be credited, the student loan servicer shall determine, within 10 business days, to which account and loan the payment should be credited. When the servicer determines to which account
 and loan the payment should be credited, the servicer shall credit the payment as of the date the payment was received by the servicer and update the borrower’s online account within one business day.

(b) If a person engaged in servicing a student loan makes a material change in the mailing address, office, or procedures for handling borrower payments, and that change causes a material delay in the crediting of a borrower payment made during the 60-day period following the date on which that change took effect, the person engaged in servicing the student loan shall not impose on the borrower any negative consequences related to that material change, including negative credit reporting, lost eligibility for a borrower benefit, late fees, interest capitalization, or other financial injury.

(c) (1) Inquire of a borrower how to apply an overpayment to a student
 loan. A borrower’s direction on how to apply an overpayment to a student loan shall be effective with respect to future overpayments during the term of a student loan until the borrower provides a different direction.

(2) (A) In the absence of a direction provided by a borrower pursuant to paragraph (1), allocate an overpayment on a student loan account in a manner that is in the best financial interest of a student loan borrower.

(B) As used in this paragraph, “best financial interest of a student loan borrower” means reducing the total cost of the student loan, including principal balance, interest, and fees.

(3) A student loan servicer shall be considered to meet the requirements of paragraph (2) if the servicer allocates the overpayment to the loan with the highest interest rate on the
 borrower’s student loan account, unless the borrower specifies otherwise.

(d) (1) Except as provided in federal law or required by a student loan agreement, comply with a direction provided by a borrower as to how to allocate a partial payment to a student loan.

(2) In the absence of a direction provided by a borrower pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision, allocate a partial payment in a manner that minimizes late fees and negative credit reporting.

(3) A student loan servicer shall be considered to have satisfied paragraph (2) if, when there are multiple loans on a borrower’s student loan account at an equal stage of delinquency, the student loan servicer allocates partial payments to satisfy as many loans as possible on a borrower’s student loan account.

(e) (1) If a student loan servicer imposes a fee on a borrower for a past due student loan payment, that fee shall be reasonable and proportional to the total costs incurred as a result of the late payment by a borrower, and shall not exceed 6 percent of any amount past due.

(2) A student loan servicer shall not impose a minimum late fee. For purposes of this paragraph, “minimum late fee” includes any fee that is not assessed as a percentage of any amount past due.

(f) Diligently oversee its service providers. For purposes of this subdivision, “diligently oversee its service providers” includes maintaining policies and procedures to oversee compliance by third-party service providers engaged in any aspect of student loan servicing. Student loan servicers have joint and several liability for the
 conduct of their service providers for any act or practice that violates this title.

(g) (1) Timely process its paperwork, consistent with existing federal requirements, including, but not limited to, ensuring that customer service personnel have received both of the following:

(A) Appropriate training about the handling of paperwork.

(B) Access to necessary information about forms and applications that are in process, have been approved, or have been denied.

(2) The requirements of this subdivision include ensuring that customer service personnel have access to applications for income-driven repayment plans and other forms required to access benefits and protections for federal student loans, as described in Section 1070 and
 following of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(h) Except as required by a student loan agreement, all records about a borrower’s account shall be maintained for the period of time during which a person performs student loan servicing for a borrower’s account and for a minimum of three years after the loan serviced has been paid in full, assigned to collection, or the servicing rights have been transferred.

(i) Treat a qualified request as if it were a qualified written request and comply with subdivision (t) with respect to that qualified request.

(j) Maintain policies and procedures permitting a borrower who is dissatisfied with the outcome of an initial qualified request to escalate the borrower’s concern to a supervisor.

(k) (1) Protect borrowers from any negative consequences that are directly related to the issue identified in a borrower’s qualified request or qualified written request until that request has been resolved. For purposes of this subdivision, “negative consequences” include, but are not limited to, negative credit reporting, lost eligibility for a borrower benefit, late fees, interest capitalization, or other financial injury.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), after receipt of a qualified request or qualified written request related to a dispute on a borrower’s payment on a student loan, a student loan servicer shall not, for 60 days, furnish information to a consumer reporting agency regarding a payment that is the subject of the qualified request or the qualified written request.

(l) Protect borrowers from any negative consequences stemming from a sale, assignment,
 transfer, system conversion, or payment made by the borrower to the original student loan servicer consistent with the original student loan servicer’s policy. For purposes of this subdivision, “negative consequences” include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Negative credit reporting.

(2) The imposition of late fees not required by the promissory note.

(3) Loss of or denial of eligibility for any benefit or protection established under federal law or included in a loan contract.

(m) If the sale, assignment, or other transfer of the servicing of a student loan results in a change in the identity of the party to whom the borrower is required to send payments or direct any communications concerning the student loan, the student loan
 servicer shall notify the borrower in writing at least 15 days before the borrower is required to send a payment on the student loan of all of the following:

(1) The identity of the new student loan servicer and the number of the license, issued by the commissioner, of the new student loan servicer.
